District of Columbia statutes.
19-1303.03

Representation by fiduciaries and parents.

To the extent there is no conflict of interest between the representative and the person represented or among those being represented with respect to a particular question or dispute:

(1)

A conservator may represent and bind the estate that the conservator controls;

(2)

A guardian may represent and bind the ward if a conservator of the ward’s estate has not been appointed;

(3)

An agent having authority to act with respect to the particular question or dispute may represent and bind the principal;

(4)

A trustee may represent and bind the beneficiaries of the trust;

(5)

A personal representative of a decedent’s estate may represent and bind persons interested in the estate;

(6)

A parent may represent and bind the parent’s minor or unborn child if a conservator or guardian for the child has not been appointed;

(7)

An individual may represent a grandchild or a more remote descendent, whether born or unborn, whom a parent may not represent and bind under paragraph (6) of this subsection; and

(8)

A qualified beneficiary may represent and bind any beneficiary who may succeed to the qualified beneficiary’s interest under the terms of the trust or pursuant to the exercise of a power of appointment.

Mar. 10, 2004, D.C. Law 15-104, § 2(b), 51 DCR 208
Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 303 of the Uniform Trust Code.